src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-osh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - ош: # Ordinary nouns 'city' - full paradigm including MWN
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ош
     ош+N+SP+Gen+Indef: ошень
     ош+N+SP+Abl+Indef: ошта
     ош+N+SP+Dat+Indef: ошенди
     ош+N+SP+Abe+Indef: ошфтома
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: ошешка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+Indef: ошса
     ош+N+SP+Ela+Indef: ошста
     ош+N+SP+Ill+Indef: [ошу, ошс]
     ош+N+SP+Prl+Indef: [ошева, ошка]
     ош+N+SP+Tra+Indef: [ошекс, ошкс]
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ошезе
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ошене, ошне]
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ошезень
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ошнень, ошенень]
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ошезти, ошезенди]
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ошненди
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: оштон
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: ошфтомон
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: ошешкан
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: ошсон
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: ошстон
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: ошезон
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: [ошеван, ошкан]
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ошце
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ошне
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ошцень
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ошнень
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: оштот
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: ошфтомот
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: ошешкат
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: ошсот
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: ошстот
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: ошезот
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: [ошеват, ошкат]
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ошец
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ошенза
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ошенц
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ошензон
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ошенцты
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ошензонды
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: оштонза
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: ошфтомонза
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: ошешканза
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: ошсонза
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: ошстонза
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: ошезонза
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: [ошеванза, ошканза]
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: ошеньке
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: ошеньконь
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: ошеньконди
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: оштонк
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: ошфтомонк
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: ошешканк
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: ошсонк
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: ошстонк
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: ошезонк
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: [ошеванк, ошканк]
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: ошенте
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: ошентень
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: ошентенди
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: ошедонт
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: ошфтомонт
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: ошешкант
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: ошсонт
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: ошстонт
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: ошезонт
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: [ошевант, ошкант]
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: ошсна
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: ошснон
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: ошснонды
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: оштост
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: ошфтомост
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: ошешкаст
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: ошсост
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: ошстост
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: ошезост
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: [ошеваст, ошкаст]
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ошт
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ошсь
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ошть
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ошти
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ошне
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ошнень
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ошненди    
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: ошевок
     #ош+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: ошеньвок
     ош+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: ошеньге 
     #синь+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Clt/Add/гЕ: синьге 
     ош+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: оштовок
     ош+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: ошендивок
     ош+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: ошфтомовок
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Clt/Add: ошешкавок
     ош+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: ошсовок
     ош+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: ошстовок
     ош+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: ошезовок
     ош+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: ошкавок
     ош+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: ошекска
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошезевок
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошеневок
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошезеньге
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошененьге
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошезтивок
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошенендивок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: оштонга
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошфтомонга
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошешканка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошсонга
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошстонга
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошезонга
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ошканга
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошцевок
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошневок
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошценьге
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошненьге
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: оштотка
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошфтомотка
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошешкатка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошсотка
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошстотка
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошезотка
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ошкатка
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошцевок
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошензовок
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошенцка
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошензонга
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошенцтывок
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошензондывок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: оштонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошфтомонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошешканзовок
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошсонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошстонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошезонзовок
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ошканзовок
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ошенькевок
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ошеньконьге
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ошенькондивок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: оштонковок
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ошфтомонковок
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ошешканковок
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ошсонковок
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ошстонковок
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ошезонковок
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ошканковок
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ошентевок
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ошентеньге
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ошентендивок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: оштонтка
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ошфтомонтка
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ошешкантка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ошсонтка
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ошстонтка
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ошезонтка
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ошкантка
     ош+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ошсновок
     ош+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ошснонга
     ош+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ошснондывок
     ош+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: оштостка
     ош+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ошфтомостка
     ош+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ошешкастка
     ош+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ошсостка
     ош+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ошстостка
     ош+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ошезостка
     ош+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ошкастка
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: оштка
     ош+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: ошське
     ош+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: оштьке
     ош+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: оштивок
     ош+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: ошневок
     ош+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: ошненьге
     ош+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: ошнендивок
